Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-1720
Nuisances; definition; prevention; abatement; joint and cooperative action with county.

(1) All cities and villages in this state are hereby granted power and authority by ordinance to define, regulate, suppress and prevent nuisances, and to declare what shall constitute a nuisance, and to abate and remove the same. Every city and village is authorized to exercise such power and authority within its zoning jurisdiction.

(2) Any city or village may enter into an interlocal agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act with a county in which the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city or village is located to provide for joint and cooperative action to abate, remove, or prevent nuisances within such extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction. The governing body of such city or village and the county board of such county shall first approve such interlocal agreement by ordinance or resolution.

Laws 1939, c. 10, § 1, p. 77;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 19-1201;

R.S.1943, § 19-1201;

Laws 1969, c. 115, § 1, p. 529;

Laws 2019, LB11, § 1.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

A city of the primary class possesses authority to sue and suppress nuisances. City of Lincoln v. ABC Books, Inc., 238 Neb. 378, 470 N.W.2d 760 (1991).